de: Typ der Spannungseinstellung des Needlepoint-Rahmens: Nocken-/Hebelverschluss; Knopf-/Schraubenspannung; Schnürspannung; Nicht anpassbar; Ratschenspannung; Flügelmutterspannung; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di regolazione della tensione del telaio per mezzo punto: Blocco a camma/leva; Tensione a manopola/vite; Tensione di allacciatura; Non regolabile; Tensione a cricchetto; Tensione con dado a farfalla; Altro
nl: Stramienraam spanningsverstelling type: Nok-/hendelsluiting; Knop-/schroefspanning; Rijgspanning; Niet verstelbaar; Ratelspanning; Vleugelmoerspanning; Anders
zh-CN: 绒绣框架张力调节类型: 凸轮/杠杆锁; 旋钮/螺钉张力; 系带张力; 不可调; 棘轮张力; 蝶形螺母张力; 其他
el: Τύπος προσαρμογής τάσης του πλαισίου κεντήματος: Κλείδωμα με έκκεντρο/μοχλό; Τάνυση με λαβή/βίδα; Τάνυση με κορδόνι; Μη ρυθμιζόμενη; Τάνυση με καστάνια; Τάνυση με παξιμάδι πεταλούδα; Άλλο
tr: Goblen çerçevesi gerginlik ayar tipi: Eksantrik/kol kilidi; Düğme/vida gerginliği; Bağcık gerginliği; Ayarlanamaz; Mandallı gerginlik; Kelebek somun gerginliği; Diğer
fi: Kirjontakehyksen kireydensäätötapa: Nokka-/vipulukko; Nuppi-/ruuvikiristys; Nyörikiristys; Ei säädettävissä; Räikkäkiristys; Siipimutterikiristys; Muu
es: Tipo de ajuste de tensión del bastidor de bordado: Bloqueo de leva/palanca; Tensión por perilla/tornillo; Tensión por atado; No ajustable; Tensión por trinquete; Tensión por tuerca de mariposa; Otro
nb: Justeringstype for nålepunkt-rammetensjon: Kam-/spaklås; Knott-/skruestramming; Snørestramming; Ikke justerbar; Skrallestramming; Vingemutterstramming; Annet
sv: Justeringstyp för ram: Kam-/spaklås; Vred-/skruvspänning; Snörspänning; Ej justerbar; Spärrhakesspänning; Vingmuttersspänning; Övrigt
ru: Тип регулировки натяжения рамы для гобеленовой вышивки: Кулачковый/рычажный фиксатор; Натяжение ручкой/винтом; Натяжение шнуровкой; Не регулируется; Храповое натяжение; Натяжение барашковой гайкой; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta podešavanja napetosti okvira platna za vezenje: Brava s polugom; Zatezanje gumbom/vijkom; Zatezanje vezivanjem; Nije podesivo; Zatezanje čegrtaljkom; Zatezanje krilastom maticom; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de ajuste da tensão da moldura para bordado: Bloqueio por came/alavanca; Tensão por botão rotativo/parafuso; Tensão por atilhos; Não ajustável; Tensão por roquete; Tensão por porca de orelhas; Outro
lt-LT: Gobeleno rėmo įtempimo reguliavimo tipas: Kumštelinis / svirtinis užraktas; Rankenėlės / sraigto įtempimas; Suvarstymo įtempimas; Nereguliuojamas; Terkšlinis įtempimas; Sparnuotosios veržlės įtempimas; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta projekta za gobelin: Zaklep z ročico; Napetost z gumbom/vijakom; Napetost z vezanjem; Ni nastavljivo; Napetost z ragljo; Napetost s krilato matico; Drugo
da: Type af spændingsjustering for stramajramme: Knast-/håndtagslås; Knap-/skruespænding; Snørespænding; Ikke justerbar; Skraldespænding; Vingemøtrikspænding; Andet
sk-SK: Typ nastavenia napnutia rámu na vyšívanie: Vačkový/pákový zámok; Napínanie skrutkou/gombíkom; Napínanie šnurovaním; Nenastaviteľné; Napínanie západkou; Napínanie krídlovou maticou; Iné
zh-TW: 針繡框張力調整類型: 凸輪/壓桿鎖定; 旋鈕/螺絲張力; 穿線張力; 不可調; 棘輪張力; 蝶形螺帽張力; 其他
pt-BR: Bastidor para tapeçaria tipo de ajuste de tensão: Trava de alavanca/came; Tensão por botão/parafuso; Tensão por amarração; Não ajustável; Tensão por catraca; Tensão por porca borboleta; Outro
hu: Gobelinkeret feszességállítási típusa: Bütykös/karos zár; Gombos/csavaros feszítő; Fűzős feszítő; Nem állítható; Racsnis feszítő; Szárnyas anyás feszítő; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการปรับความตึง Frame ปักเข็ม: ล็อกแบบลูกเบี้ยว/คันโยก; การปรับความตึงด้วยลูกบิด/สกรู; การปรับความตึงด้วยการร้อยเชือก; ปรับไม่ได้; การปรับความตึงแบบวงล้อ; การปรับความตึงด้วยน็อตหางปลา; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ regulacji napięcia ramy needlepoint: Blokada krzywkowa/dźwigniowa; Naciąg pokrętłem/śrubą; Naciąg sznurowaniem; Bez regulacji; Naciąg zapadkowy; Naciąg nakrętką motylkową; Inne
cs: Typ nastavení napětí vyšívacího rámu: Zámek s vačkou/páčkou; Napínání pomocí knoflíku / šroubu; Napínání šněrováním; Nenastavitelné; Ráčnové napínání; Napínání křídlovou maticí; Ostatní
ko: 니들포인트 프레임 장력 조절 유형: 캠/레버 잠금장치; 노브/나사 텐션; 레이싱 텐션; 조절 불가; 래칫 텐션; 윙 너트 텐션; 기타
ja: ニードルポイントFrame張力調整タイプ: カム/レバーロック; ノブ/ネジ式テンション; レーシングテンション; 調整不可; ラチェットテンション; 蝶ナットテンション; その他
en: Needlepoint frame tension adjustment type: Cam/lever lock; Knob/screw tension; Lacing tension; Not adjustable; Ratchet tension; Wing nut tension; Other
fr: Type de réglage de la tension du cadre à tapisserie: Verrouillage à came/levier; Tension à bouton/vis; Tension de laçage; Non réglable; Tension à cliquet; Tension à écrou papillon; Autre
vi: Loại điều chỉnh độ căng khung thêu: Khóa cam/khóa đòn bẩy; Chỉnh căng bằng núm xoay/ốc vít; Chỉnh căng bằng dây buộc; Không thể điều chỉnh; Chỉnh căng bằng bánh cóc; Chỉnh căng bằng đai ốc cánh bướm; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul de ajustare a tensiunii pentru cadrul de goblen: Blocare cu camă/pârghie; Tensiune prin buton/șurub; Tensiune prin șnur; Nereglabilă; Tensiune prin clichet; Tensiune prin piuliță fluture; Altele
bg-BG: Тип регулиране на опъна на рамката за гоблен: Гърбично/лостово заключване; Натягане с копче/винт; Натягане с връзки; Не се регулира; Натягане с тресчотка; Натягане с крилчата гайка; Друго